District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0486.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act may
be cited as the “Expanding Fertility Treatment Options Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section (5f) of the Women’s Health and Cancer Rights Federal Law Conformity
Act of 2000, effective April 3, 2001 (D.C. Law 13-254; D.C. Official Code § 31-3831 et seq.), is
amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph 1 is amended as follows:
(A) Existing text is redesignated as (a)(1)(A).
(B) Add a new sub-paragraph (B) to read as follows:
“(B) Beginning January 1, 2027, a health insurer offering a large group
health benefit plan shall provide coverage for oocyte cryopreservation, as provided in paragraph
(2) of this subsection; provided that the treatment would be consistent with a physician’s or
surgeon’s overall plan of care.”.
(2) Paragraph (2) is amended as follows:

(A) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking “.” and inserting the phrase
“; and” in its place.
(B) A new subparagraph (C) is added to read as follows:
“(C) The storage of frozen oocytes for a minimum period of 10 years.”.
(b) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
(A) Existing text is redesignated as (1)(A).
(B) A new sub-paragraph (B) is added to read as follows:
“(B) Beginning January 1, 2027, a health insurer offering an individual
health benefit plan or small group health plan shall provide coverage for oocyte
cryopreservation, as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection; provided that the treatment
would be consistent with a physician’s or surgeon’s overall plan of care.”.
(2) Paragraph (2) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking “.” and inserting the phrase
“; and” in its place.
(B) A new subparagraph (C) is added to read as follows:
“(C) The storage of frozen oocytes for a minimum period of 10 years.”.
(c) Subsection (c) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
(A) Existing text is redesignated as (1)(A).
(B) A new sub-paragraph (B) is added to read as follows:
“(B) Beginning January 1, 2027, the DC Healthcare Alliance program
shall also provide health insurance coverage for oocyte cryopreservation.”.

(d) New subsections (c-1), (c-2), and (c-3) are added to read as follows:
“(c-1)(1) Beginning January 1, 2027, a health insurer offering a large group health benefit
plan shall provide coverage for elective oocyte retrieval and cryopreservation, as provided in
paragraph (2) of this subsection; provided that the treatment would be consistent with a
physician's or surgeon's overall plan of care.
“(2) The health benefit plan shall cover:
“(A) Proactive fertility care;
“(B) At least 3 complete oocyte retrievals with unlimited embryo transfers
from those oocyte retrievals or from any oocyte retrieval performed prior to January 1, 2027, in
accordance with the guidelines of ASRM, using single embryo transfer when recommended and
medically appropriate; and
“(C) The storage of the frozen oocyte for a minimum period of 10 years.
“(c-2)(1) Beginning January 1, 2027, a health insurer offering an individual health benefit
plan or small group health plan shall provide coverage for elective oocyte retrieval and
cryopreservation, as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection; provided that the treatment
would be consistent with a physician's or surgeon's overall plan of care.
“(2) The health benefit plan shall cover:
“(A) Proactive fertility care;
“(B) At least 3 complete oocyte retrievals with unlimited embryo transfers
from those oocyte retrievals or from any oocyte retrieval performed prior to January 1, 2027, in
accordance with the guidelines of ASRM, using single embryo transfer when recommended and
medically appropriate; and
“(C) The storage of the frozen oocyte for a minimum period of 10 years.

“(c-3)(1) Beginning January 1, 2027, the DC Healthcare Alliance program shall provide
health insurance coverage for elective oocyte retrieval and cryopreservation, as provided in
paragraph (2) of this subsection; provided that the treatment would be consistent with a
physician's or surgeon's overall plan of care.
“(2) The health benefit plan shall cover:
“(A) Proactive fertility care;
“(B) At least 3 complete oocyte retrievals with unlimited embryo transfers
from those oocyte retrievals or from any oocyte retrieval performed prior to January 1, 2027, in
accordance with the guidelines of ASRM, using single embryo transfer when recommended and
medically appropriate; and
“(C) The storage of the frozen oocyte for a minimum period of 10 years.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.